Washington statutes.
RCW 17.15.020

Implementation of integrated pest management practices.

Each of the following state agencies or institutions or county agencies shall implement integrated pest management practices when carrying out the agency's or institution's duties related to pest control:

(1) The department of agriculture;

(2) The state noxious weed control board;

(3) The department of ecology;

(4) The department of fish and wildlife;

(5) The department of transportation;

(6) The parks and recreation commission;

(7) The department of natural resources;

(8) The department of corrections;

(9) The department of enterprise services;

(10) Each state institution of higher education, for the institution's own building and grounds maintenance;

(11) Each county noxious weed control board; and

(12) Each weed district.

[ 2021 c 217 s 17; 2015 c 225 s 16; 1997 c 357 s 3.]